Massachusetts, session 194th, H1773.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after Section 43A the following new section:-
Section 43B. (a) (1) For the purposes of this section, the term “electronic mobile tracking
device” shall mean any device that tracks and reveals the location of the device and transmits the
location to a mobile phone or computer.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, whoever willfully and knowingly
installs, conceals, or otherwise places for use an electronic mobile tracking device in or on a
motor vehicle without the consent of the operator and occupants of the vehicle for the purpose of
of 3

monitoring or following the operator or occupants of the vehicle shall be guilty of the crime of
criminal harassment, as provided in section 43A of chapter 265 and the punishments thereof.
(b) (1) It shall not be a violation of this section if the installation, concealment,
placement, or use of an electronic mobile tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is by, or at the
direction of, a law enforcement officer in furtherance of a criminal investigation and is carried
out in accordance with applicable state and federal laws.
(2) It shall not be a violation of this section if the installation, concealment, placement, or
use of an electronic mobile tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is by a parent or legal
guardian that owns or leases the vehicle, and if the device is used solely for the purpose of
monitoring a minor child of the parent or legal guardian when the child is an operator of the
vehicle.
(3) It shall not be a violation of this section if the electronic mobile tracking device is
attached to a vehicle that has been stolen from the owner for the purposes of locating the stolen
vehicle, upon notice to local law enforcement.
(4) It shall not be a violation of this section if an electronic mobile tracking device is
installed and or used by a business that does business in the Commonwealth and the device is
used for the purpose of tracking vehicles that are owned or leased by the business and driven by
employees or affiliates of such business.
(c) The provisions of this section shall not apply to electronic or telematic systems
installed by the manufacturer of a motor vehicle or such systems used by businesses licensed to
rent cars to consumers or by insurance companies upon the owner’s or vehicles lessee’s
permission.
of 3

(d) A violation of this section shall be punishable under the punishments provided in
section 43A of chapter 265.
of 3